Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 285B.059 is amended to read:
285B.059. (1) The Oregon Business Development Commission may  approve a business develop-
ment project  proposed in an application filed under ORS 285B.050 to 285B.098 if, after investigation,
the commission finds that:
(a) The proposed business development project is feasible and a reasonable risk  from practical
and economic standpoints, and that the loan has reasonable prospect of repayment.
(b) The applicant can provide good and sufficient collateral for the loan.
(c) Moneys in the Oregon Business Development Fund are or will be available  for the proposed
business development project.
(d) There is a need for the proposed business development project.
(e) The applicant has not received or  entered into a contract or contracts exceeding [ $1] $2
million with  the commission, under authority of ORS 285B.050 to 285B.098, for the previous 365 days.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, the total amount of moneys loaned
from the fund for a business development project may not exceed 50 percent of the  cost of the
project.
(b) The total  amount of moneys loaned from the fund for a business development project may
exceed 50 percent of the cost of the project if two or more lenders  have denied requests from the
applicant to commit to participate in the financing of  the project and the applicant has no other
available financing.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, moneys may not be loaned from the
fund for a business development project unless  there exists a commitment from a commercial or
private lender, or a local development group, to participate in the financing of the project.
(b) Moneys may be loaned from the fund for a business  development project without a commit-
ment from a commercial or private lender, or a local  development group, to participate in the fi-
nancing of the project if:
(A) The applicant is a county or municipality;
(B) There are payments other than the scheduled principal and interest payments; or
(C) Two or more lenders have denied requests  from the applicant to commit to participate in the
financing of the project and the applicant has no other available financing.
Enrolled House Bill 2037 (HB 2037-INTRO) Page 1
(4) To  encourage private sector and local development group participation in the financing of
business development projects, the commission may subordinate the security position of the fund to
that of other lenders.
(5) In each fiscal year  of a biennium, 15 percent of all moneys available for lending from the
fund is reserved for loans  to emerging small business enterprises as defined by the Oregon Business
Development Department by rule, which are located  in or draw their workforces from within rural
or distressed areas as determined by the Oregon Business  Development Department in cooperation
with the Employment Department of  this state. If the Oregon Business Development Department
was unable to obtain a sufficient number of approvable  applications to meet the requirements of this
subsection in the previous fiscal year, it may, in the current fiscal year  and notwithstanding the
limitations imposed by ORS 285B.050 (2), make loans, in  an amount that does not exceed the 15
percent reserved for the prior fiscal year less the amount of  loans made to emerging small business
enterprises located in rural or  distressed areas during the previous fiscal year, to service and retail
businesses operated by small business  enterprises that are located in or draw their workforces from
within rural  or distressed areas as determined by the Oregon Business Development Department in
cooperation with the Employment Department of this state.  Service and retail businesses operated
by small business enterprises under this section need not be engaged in traded  sector activities. As
used in this subsection, “rural area” and “distressed area” have the [ meaning] meanings given those
terms in ORS 285A.010.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 285B.062 is amended to read:
285B.062. If  the Oregon Business Development Commission approves [ the] a business develop-
ment project, the commission, on behalf of the state, and the applicant may enter into  a loan con-
tract of not more than [ $1] $2 million, secured by good and sufficient collateral, which shall set
forth, among other matters:
(1) A plan for repayment by the applicant to  the Oregon Business Development Fund of moneys
borrowed from the fund used for the business development project , with interest  charged on those
moneys at the rate of not  less than one percentage point more than the prevailing interest rate on
United States Treasury bills, notes or  bonds of a comparable term, as determined by the commission.
The repayment plan, among other matters:
(a) Shall provide for commencement  of repayment by the applicant of the moneys [ used for the
business development  project and interest thereon ] and interest no later than one year after the date
of the loan contract or at such other time as the commission may provide.
(b) May provide for reasonable extension of the time for making  any repayment in emergency
or hardship circumstances if approved by the commission.
(c) Shall provide for such evidence of debt assurance of, and security for, repayment by the  ap-
plicant as is considered necessary by the commission.
(d) Shall set forth a  schedule of payments and the period of  the loan , [which shall] not to exceed
the [ usable] useful life of the contracted project or 25 years from the date of the contract, which-
ever is less, and [ shall also set forth ] the manner of determining when loan payments are  delinquent.
The payment  schedule shall include repayment of interest [ which] that accrues during any period
of delay in repayment authorized by paragraph (a) of this subsection, and the payment  schedule may
require payments of varying amounts for collection of accrued interest.
(e) Shall set forth a procedure for formal declaration of default of payment  by the commission,
including formal  notification of all relevant federal, state and local agencies[ ;] and [ further,] a pro-
cedure for notification of all relevant  federal, state and local agencies that declaration of default
has been rescinded when appropriate.
(f) Shall allow for other forms of payment than  principal and interest payments on loans, to be
outlined in administrative rules.
(2) Provisions satisfactory to the commission for field engineering and inspection,  the commis-
sion to be the final judge of completion of the contract.
(3) That the liability of the state under the contract is contingent upon the availability of mon-
eys in the fund for use in the business development project.
Enrolled House Bill 2037 (HB 2037-INTRO) Page 2
(4) Such further provisions as the commission considers necessary to [ insure] ensure expendi-
ture of the funds for the purposes set forth in the approved application.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 285B.059 and 285B.062 by sections 1 and 2  of this
2021 Act apply to applications for business development projects submitted  on or after the
effective date of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS  285B.050 to
285B.098.
SECTION 5. (1) Beginning with the 2023 calendar year, the Oregon Business Development
Department shall annually adjust the maximum contract amounts specified in  ORS 285B.059
(1)(e) and 285B.062 by multiplying each  amount by the percentage change in the monthly
averaged Consumer Price Index for  All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as pub-
lished by the Bureau  of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, for the
12 consecutive months ending on the immediately  preceding December 31 compared to the
monthly averaged Consumer Price Index for All  Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items),
for the 12 consecutive months ending on December 31, 2021.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the adjusted maximum  contract
amounts specified in ORS 285B.059 (1)(e) and 285B.062 may not be less than $2 million.
Passed by House March 16, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2037 (HB 2037-INTRO) Page 3